en: Life Jackets
xx: Life Jackets
cs: Záchranné vesty
da: Redningsveste
de: Rettungswesten
es: Chalecos salvavidas
fr: Gilets de sauvetage, Ceinture et gilet de sauvetage textile
it: Giubbotti di salvataggio
ja: ライフジャケット
nl: Reddingsvesten
no: Redningsvester
pl: Kamizelki ratunkowe
pt: Coletes salva-vidas
ru: Спасательные жилеты
sv: Flytvästar
tr: Can Yelekleri

en: Rash Guards & Swim Shirts
xx: Rash Guards & Swim Shirts
cs: Funkční oblečení na vodní sporty
da: Svømmetrøjer
de: Rashguards & Schwimmshirts
es: Camisetas de protección y natación
fr: Vêtements anti-irritations et de baignade
it: Magliette da nuoto e antiabrasione
ja: ラッシュガード
nl: Rashguards en zwemshirts
no: Trenings- og svømmeskjorter
pl: Odzież ochronna do pływania
pt: Roupa para surfe ou mergulho
ru: Рашгарды
sv: Utslagsskydd och simtröjor
tr: Kızarıklık Koruyucu Giysiler ve Yüzme Giysileri

en: Water Sport Helmets
xx: Water Sport Helmets
cs: Přilby na vodní sporty
da: Hjelme til vandsport
de: Wassersporthelme
es: Cascos para deportes acuáticos
fr: Casques de sports nautiques
it: Caschi per sport acquatici
ja: ウォータースポーツ用ヘルメット
nl: Watersporthelmen
no: Vannsporthjelmer
pl: Kaski do uprawiania sportów wodnych
pt: Capacetes para esportes aquáticos
ru: Шлемы для водных видов спорта
sv: Hjälmar för vattensporter
tr: Su Sporu Kaskları

en: Wetsuit Pieces
xx: Wetsuit Pieces
cs: Neoprenové díly
da: Våddragtdele
de: Neoprenanzugteile
es: Partes de trajes de neopreno
fr: Éléments de combinaisons de plongée
it: Componenti di mute subacquee
ja: ウェットスーツ（部位別）
nl: Delen van wetsuits
no: Våtdraktdeler
pl: Pianki w częściach
pt: Roupas de mergulho
ru: Части гидрокостюмов
sv: Våtdräktsdelar
tr: Wetsuit Parçaları

en: Wetsuit Bottoms
xx: Wetsuit Bottoms
cs: Neoprenové kalhoty
da: Våddragter – bukser
de: Neopren-Unterteile
es: Pantalones de neopreno
fr: Bas de combinaison
it: Pantaloni muta
ja: ウェットスーツボトムス
nl: Wetsuitbroeken
no: Våtdrakt-underdeler
pl: Pianki - części dolne
pt: Calças para mergulho
ru: Штаны гидрокостюмов
sv: Våtdräktsbyxor
tr: Dalgıç Kıyafeti Alt Parçaları

en: Wetsuit Hoods\, Gloves & Boots
xx: Wetsuit Hoods\, Gloves & Boots
cs: Neoprenové kukly\, rukavice a boty
da: Våddragter – tilbehør
de: Kappen\, Handschuhe & Stiefel für Neoprenanzüge
es: Capuchas\, guantes y botas para trajes de neopreno
fr: Cagoules\, gants et bottes de plongée
it: Calzari\, guanti e cappucci per mute subacquee
ja: ウェットスーツ小物
nl: Wetsuit-accessoires
no: Hetter\, sko og hansker til våtdrakt
pl: Pianki - akcesoria
pt: Acessórios para mergulho
ru: Шлемы\, перчатки и боты для гидрокостюмов
sv: Huvor\, handskar och stövlar till våtdräkter
tr: Dalgıç Kıyafeti Aksesuarları

en: Wetsuit Tops
xx: Wetsuit Tops
cs: Neoprenová trika
da: Våddrager – overdele
de: Neopren-Oberteile
es: Tops de neopreno
fr: Hauts de combinaison
it: Maglie da sub
ja: ウェットスーツトップス
nl: Tops voor wetsuits
no: Våtdrakt-overdeler
pl: Pianki - części górne
pt: Blusas para mergulho
ru: Куртки гидрокостюмов
sv: Våtdräktsjackor
tr: Dalgıç Kıyafeti Üst Parçaları

en: Wetsuits
xx: Wetsuits
cs: Neoprenové obleky
da: Våddragter
de: Neoprenanzüge
es: Trajes de neopreno
fr: Combinaisons de sports nautiques, Combinaison en néoprène enfant
it: Mute
ja: ウェットスーツ
nl: Wetsuits
no: Våtdrakter
pl: Stroje piankowe
pt: Roupas para mergulho
ru: Гидрокостюмы
sv: Våtdräkter
tr: Dalgıç Kıyafetleri

en: Diving & Snorkeling
xx: Diving & Snorkeling
cs: Potápění a šnorchlování
da: Dykning og snorkeldykning
de: Tauchen & Schnorcheln
es: Buceo y buceo con esnórquel
fr: Plongée et snorkeling, Bouteille de plongée
it: Immersioni e snorkeling
ja: ダイビング・シュノーケリング
nl: Duiken en snorkelen
no: Dykking og snorkling
pl: Nurkowanie i snorkeling
pt: Mergulho e snorkeling
ru: Товары для дайвинга и сноркелинга
sv: Sportdykning och snorkling
tr: Tüplü Dalış ve Şnorkelle Yüzme

en: Buoyancy Compensators
xx: Buoyancy Compensators
cs: Kompenzátory vztlaku
da: Flydekompensatorer
de: Tarierwesten
es: Compensadores de flotabilidad
fr: Compensateurs de flottabilité
it: Giubbotti assetto variabile
ja: ダイビングBCD
nl: Duikvesten
no: Dykkervester
pl: Kamizelki ratowniczo-wypornościowe
pt: Compensadores de flutuação
ru: Компенсаторы плавучести
sv: Avvägningsvästar
tr: Yüzerlik Dengeleyici

en: Dive Computers
xx: Dive Computers
cs: Potápěčské počítače
da: Dykkecomputere
de: Tauchcomputer
es: Ordenadores de buceo
fr: Ordinateurs de plongée
it: Computer subacquei
ja: ダイブコンピューター
nl: Duikcomputers
no: Dykkerdatamaskiner
pl: Komputery nurkowe
pt: Medidor de descompressão
ru: Компьютеры для дайвинга
sv: Dykdatorer
tr: Dekompresyon Ölçerler

en: Diving & Snorkeling Equipment Sets
xx: Diving & Snorkeling Equipment Sets
cs: Sady vybavení na potápění a šnorchlování
da: Dykkersæt og snorklesæt
de: Tauch- & Schnorchelausrüstung
es: Conjuntos de equipamiento para buceo y esnórquel
fr: Ensembles d'équipements de plongée et snorkeling
it: Set di attrezzature per immersioni e snorkeling
ja: ダイビング・シュノーケリング用品セット
nl: Sets met duik- en snorkelbenodigdheden
no: Utstyrssett for dykking og snorkling
pl: Zestawy do nurkowania z rurką lub akwalungiem
pt: Conjuntos de equipamento para mergulho e snorkeling
ru: Комплекты оборудования для дайвинга и сноркелинга
sv: Utrustning för sportdykning och snorkling
tr: Tüplü Dalış ve Şnorkelle Yüzme Ekipman Setleri

en: Diving & Snorkeling Fins
xx: Diving & Snorkeling Fins
cs: Potápěčské a šnorchlovací ploutve
da: Svømmefødder til dykning og snorkling
de: Tauch- & Schnorchelflossen
es: Aletas de buceo
fr: Palmes de plongée
it: Pinne snorkeling e subacquea
ja: ダイビング・シュノーケリング用フィン
nl: Zwemvliezen voor duiken en snorkelen
no: Dykke- og snorklefinner
pl: Płetwy
pt: Pé de pato para mergulho e snorkeling
ru: Ласты для дайвинга и сноркелинга
sv: Dyk- och snorklingsfenor
tr: Dalış ve Şnorkelle Yüzme Paletleri

en: Diving & Snorkeling Masks
xx: Diving & Snorkeling Masks
cs: Potápěčské a šnorchlovací masky
da: Dykker- og snorkelmasker
de: Tauch- & Schnorchelmasken
es: Gafas de buceo
fr: Masques de plongée et tuba
it: Maschere snorkeling e subacquea
ja: ダイビング・シュノーケリング用マスク
nl: Duikbrillen voor duiken en snorkelen
no: Dykke- og snorklemasker
pl: Maski do nurkowania
pt: Máscara para mergulho e snorkeling
ru: Маски для дайвинга и сноркелинга
sv: Dyk- och snorklingsmasker
tr: Dalış ve Şnorkelle Yüzme Maskeleri

en: Diving Belts
xx: Diving Belts
cs: Potápěčské opasky
da: Dykkerbælter
de: Bleigürtel
es: Cinturones de buceo
fr: Ceintures de lestage
it: Cinture per immersioni
ja: ダイビング用ウエイト・ベルト
nl: Loodgordels
no: Dykkerbelter
pl: Pasy balastowe
pt: Cintos de mergulho
ru: Пояса для дайвинга
sv: Viktbälten
tr: Dalış Kemerleri

en: Diving Knives & Shears
xx: Diving Knives & Shears
cs: Potápěčské nože a nůžky
da: Dykkerknive og -sakse
de: Tauchermesser & -scheren
es: Tijeras y cuchillos para bucear
fr: Couteaux et cisailles de plongée
it: Coltelli e forbici da sub
ja: ダイビングナイフ・水中はさみ
nl: Duikmessen en -scharen
no: Dykkerkniver og -sakser
pl: Noże do nurkowania
pt: Tesouras e facas para mergulho
ru: Водолазные ножи
sv: Dykknivar och saxar
tr: Dalış Bıçak ve Makasları

en: Diving Regulators
xx: Diving Regulators
cs: Regulátory pro potápění
da: Dykkerregulatorer
de: Atemregler
es: Reguladores
fr: Détendeurs de plongée
it: Regolatori per immersioni
ja: ダイビングレギュレーター
nl: Reduceereenheden voor duiken
no: Pusteventiler
pl: Automaty oddechowe
pt: Reguladores de mergulho
ru: Регуляторы для дайвинга
sv: Regulatorer
tr: Dalış Regülatörleri

en: Snorkels
xx: Snorkels
cs: Šnorchly
da: Snorkler
de: Schnorchel
es: Esnórqueles
fr: Tubas de natation, Tuba
it: Boccagli
ja: シュノーケル
nl: Snorkels
no: Snorkler
pl: Fajki do nurkowania
pt: Tanques de oxigênio
ru: Трубки для сноркелинга
sv: Snorklar
tr: Şnorkeller

en: Kitesurfing
xx: Kitesurfing
cs: Kitesurfing
da: Kitesurfing
de: Kitesurfen
es: Kitesurf
fr: Kitesurf
it: Kitesurf
ja: カイトサーフィン
nl: Kitesurfen
no: Kitesurfing
pl: Kitesurfing
pt: Kitesurf
ru: Товары для кайтсёрфинга
sv: Kitesurfning
tr: Uçurtma Sörfü

en: Kiteboard Cases
xx: Kiteboard Cases
cs: Pouzdra na kiteboardy
da: Kiteboard – tasker
de: Kiteboard-Taschen
es: Fundas para tabla de kitesurf
fr: Sacs et housses pour kitesurf
it: Custodie per kitesurf
ja: カイトボードケース
nl: Koffers voor kiteboards
no: Kitebrett-omslag
pl: Pokrowce na deski do kitesurfingu
pt: Estojos para kiteboard
ru: Чехлы для кайтбордов
sv: Fodral till kitesurfbrädor
tr: Uçurtma Sörfü Tahtası Kutuları